Idaho, session 2026, H0811.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 50-3101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-3101. PURPOSE, RELATIONSHIP WITH OTHER LAWS AND SHORT TITLE. (1)
The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To encourage the funding and construction of regional community in-
frastructure in advance of actual developmental growth that creates the
need for such additional infrastructure;
(b) To provide a means for the advance payment of development impact
fees established in chapter 82, title 67, Idaho Code, and the community
infrastructure that may be financed thereby; and
(c) To create additional financial tools and financing mechanisms that
allow new growth to more expediently pay for itself.
(2) Only community infrastructure to be publicly owned by this state or
a political subdivision thereof may be financed pursuant to this chapter.
(3) A community infrastructure district may only be formed pursuant to
this chapter only by a city in the city's incorporated area, or by a county
in an area contained within a city's comprehensive plan with the city's con-
sent, or by a county when the district is outside of a city's comprehensive
plan.
(4) A community infrastructure district may be formed only after (i)
prior review and approval by the governing body of each county or city in
which the district is proposed to be located of a petition requesting the
formation of the district, and (ii) the necessary approvals for site de-
velopment under the local land use planning act, sections 67-6501 et seq.,
Idaho Code, and the planning and zoning ordinances of each county and city
in which the district is proposed to be located have been obtained; provided
however, that where there will be phased development, approvals obtained


for the first phase of site development shall be sufficient for the initial
creation and organization of the district. The formation of a district
pursuant to this chapter shall not prevent the exercise by a county, city
or other political subdivision of any of its powers on the same basis as on
all other land within its jurisdiction. Notwithstanding the formation of a
district, the development of real property located within the district shall
remain subject to the provisions of chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code, and
the applicable planning and zoning ordinances of the counties and cities in
which the district is located. The formation of a district pursuant to this
chapter shall not prevent the subsequent establishment of other districts or
the improvement or assessment of land within the district by a county, city
or other political subdivision.
(5) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Community In-
frastructure District Act."
SECTION 2. That Section 50-3102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-3102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the following terms
shall have the meanings as stated:
(1) "Assessment area" means real property within the boundaries of a
community infrastructure district that is the subject of a specific special
assessment as set forth in this chapter.
(2) "Community infrastructure" means improvements that have a substan-
tial nexus to the district and directly or indirectly benefit the district.
Community infrastructure excludes public improvements fronting individual
single-family residential lots. Community infrastructure includes plan-
ning, design, engineering, construction, acquisition or installation of
such infrastructure, including the costs of applications, impact fees and
other fees, permits and approvals related to the construction, acquisition
or installation of such infrastructure, and incurring expenses incident to
and reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Com-
munity infrastructure includes all public facilities as defined in section
67-8203(24), Idaho Code, and, to the extent not already included within the
definition in section 67-8203(24), Idaho Code, the following:
(a) Highways, parkways, expressways, interstates, or other such des-
ignations, interchanges, bridges, crossing structures, and related ap-
purtenances;
(b) Public parking facilities, including all areas for vehicular use
for travel, ingress, egress and parking;
(c) Trails and areas for pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle or other non-
motor vehicle use for travel, ingress, egress and parking;
(d) Public safety facilities;
(e) Acquiring interests in real property for community infrastructure;
(f) Financing costs related to the construction of items listed in this
subsection; and
(g) Impact fees.
(3) "Community infrastructure segment" means a separate or a dis-
cernible portion of a construction contract attributable to community
infrastructure.


(4) "Debt service" means the principal of, interest on and premium, if
any, on the bonds when due, whether at maturity or prior redemption, and fees
and costs of registrars, trustees, paying agents or other agents necessary
to handle the bonds and the costs of credit enhancement or liquidity support.
(5) "Discharge date" means the date on which no further payments will be
due on an outstanding bond, regardless of the amount of principal and inter-
est paid prior to such date, as provided in section 50-3111, Idaho Code.
(5) (6) "District" means a community infrastructure district formed
pursuant to this chapter. A district formed after July 1, 2022, shall not
exclude from the district any land that is completely surrounded by property
in the district. A district shall only include only contiguous property
at the time of formation. Land that is connected by only a shoestring or
strip of land that comprises a railroad or highway right-of-way shall not be
considered contiguous for the purposes of this chapter. Subsequent to a dis-
trict's formation, a district may include noncontiguous property but only if
specifically determined by the district board to have a substantial nexus to
the initial district or to the community infrastructure contemplated by the
initial district and then authorized by the district board in its discretion
and pursuant to section 50-3106, Idaho Code.
(6) (7) "District board" means the board of directors of the district.
(7) (8) "District development agreement" means an agreement between a
property owner or developer, the county or city, any other political subdi-
vision of the state, and/or the district. A district development agreement
shall be used to establish obligations of the parties to the agreement re-
lating to district financing and development, including: intergovernmental
agreements; the ultimate public ownership of the community infrastructure
financed by the district; the understanding of the parties with regard to
future annexations of property into the district; the total amount of bonds
to be issued by the district and the property taxes and special assessments
to be levied and imposed to repay the bonds and the provisions regarding
the disbursement of bond proceeds; the financial assurances, if any, to be
provided with respect to the bonds; impact and other fees imposed by gov-
ernmental authorities, including credit, prepayment and/or reimbursement
with respect thereto; temporary assessments and the disbursement of revenue
from such assessments pursuant to section 50-3122, Idaho Code; and other
matters relating to the community infrastructure, such as construction, ac-
quisition, planning, design, inspection, ownership and control. A district
development agreement shall be in addition to and shall not supplant any de-
velopment agreement entered into pursuant to section 67-6511A, Idaho Code,
pursuant to which a governing body may require or permit, as a condition of
rezoning, that an owner or developer make a written commitment concerning
the use or development of the subject parcel.
(8) (9) "General plan" means the general plan described in section
50-3103(1), Idaho Code, as the plan may be amended from time to time.
(9) (10) "Governing body" means the county commissioners or city coun-
cil that by law is constituted as the governing body of the county or city in
which the district is located. Reference in this chapter to "governing body
or bodies" shall mean the governing body or bodies of each county and city in
which the district is located.


(10) (11) "Owner" means the person listed as the owner of real property
within the district or a proposed district on the current property rolls in
effect at the time that the action, proceeding, hearing or election has be-
gun; provided however, that if a person listed on the property rolls is no
longer the owner of real property within the district or a proposed district
and the name of the successor owner becomes known and is verified by recorded
deed or other similar evidence of transfer of ownership, the successor owner
shall be deemed to be the owner for the purposes of this chapter.
(11) (12) "Market value for assessment purposes" means the amount of the
last preceding equalized assessment of all taxable property and excludes
all property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602G, Idaho Code,
within the community infrastructure district on the tax rolls completed and
available as of the date of approval in the district bond issuance.
(12) (13) "Person" means any entity, individual, corporation, partner-
ship, firm, association, limited liability company, limited liability part-
nership, trust or other such entities as recognized by the state of Idaho.
A "person in interest" is any person who is a qualified elector in the dis-
trict, who is an owner of real property in the district or who is a real prop-
erty taxpayer in the district.
(13) (14) "Qualified elector" means a person who possesses all of the
qualifications required of electors under the general laws of the state of
Idaho and:
(a) Resides within the boundaries of a district or a proposed district
and who is a qualified elector. For purposes of this chapter, such elec-
tor shall also be known as a "resident qualified elector"; or
(b) Is an owner of real property that is located within the district or a
proposed district, who is not a resident qualified elector as set forth
above. For purposes of this chapter, such elector shall also be known as
an "owner qualified elector."
(14) (15) "Special assessment" means an assessment imposed upon real
property located within an assessment area for a specific purpose and of a
special benefit to the affected property, collected and enforced in the same
manner as property taxes, that may be apportioned according to the direct or
indirect special benefits conferred upon the affected property, as well as
any, or any combination, of the following: acreage, square footage, front
footage, the cost of providing community infrastructure for the affected
property, or any other reasonable method as determined by the district
board.
SECTION 3. That Section 50-3108, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-3108. GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS -- ELECTION -- MAXIMUM INDEBTEDNESS
ALLOWED -- LEVY. (1) After district formation, whenever the district board
shall deem it advisable to issue general obligation bonds of the district,
the district board shall provide therefor by resolution, which resolution
shall specify and set forth the community infrastructure and other costs and
expenses approved by the district board consistent with the general plan to
be financed with the bonds, and make provision for the collection of an an-
nual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds as it falls due, and also


to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof as re-
quired by the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho.
(2) The resolution shall also provide for holding an election, held
in compliance with section 50-3112, Idaho Code, to submit to the qualified
electors of the district the question of authorizing the district to issue
general obligation bonds of the district to provide money for said community
infrastructure consistent with the general plan. The ballot used in such
election shall be in form substantially as follows: "In favor of issuing
bonds to the amount of.......... dollars for the purpose stated in Resolu-
tion No....," and "Against issuing bonds to the amount of......... dollars
for the purpose stated in Resolution No....".
(3) If two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors at such election
assent to the issuing of the bonds and the incurring of the indebtedness
thereby created for the purpose aforesaid, the district board shall there-
upon be authorized to issue and create such indebtedness in the manner and
for the purposes specified in said resolution, and the bonds shall be issued
and sold in the manner provided by the laws of the state of Idaho, and the
district board by further resolution shall be entitled to issue and sell
the bonds in series or divisions up to the authorized amount without the
further vote of the qualified electors, and to issue and sell such bonds at
such times and in such amounts as the district board deems appropriate to
carry out a community infrastructure project or projects in phases; pro-
vided however, that before any issuance of the bonds, including issuance in
series or divisions and, in addition to such other determinations made by
the district board as it may deem reasonable and prudent, the district board
shall also determine whether reasonable financial assurance for the payment
of the debt service on the bonds through additional collateral, payment
guarantee or otherwise shall be required from a developer. The developer
shall be consulted and shall be given a reasonable period of time within
which to appear, either in person or in writing, and respond to any proposed
financial assurance. If, following such developer's response, the district
board determines that reasonable financial assurance shall be required, the
district board shall specify the type and amount of the financial assurance
required in its resolution.
(4) In no event shall the aggregate outstanding principal amount of
general obligation bonds and any other indebtedness for which the full faith
and credit of the district are pledged exceed nine percent (9%) of the ac-
tual or adjusted market value for assessment purposes on all taxable real
property within the district as such valuation existed on December 31 of the
previous year.
(5) After the bonds are issued, the district shall enter in its minutes
a record of the bonds sold and their number and dates and shall periodically
collect the pledged revenues to pay the debt service on the bonds when due.
(6) Bond proceeds received by the district shall be held in a segregated
account and shall be disbursed therefrom only for:
(a) The payment of community infrastructure and/or community in-
frastructure segments approved by the district board and actually
completed; or
(b) For the purpose of reimbursing actually paid expenditures relating
to community infrastructure as approved by the district board; provided


however, that lien releases with respect to the payment made must be ob-
tained from the underlying providers of labor, work, services or mate-
rials as a condition to such payment; or
(c) For the payment or reimbursement of governmentally imposed impact
fees as approved by the district board.
(7) Completion of community infrastructure may be phased and payment
made pursuant to a draw schedule. Bond proceeds shall be expended on the com-
munity infrastructure within three (3) years after issuance. Prior to is-
suance of the bonds, the district board shall determine that such bond pro-
ceeds can reasonably be expended within that time.
(8) Each year, prior to the time for the certification required under
section 50-3114, Idaho Code, the district board shall levy a tax upon all
taxable real property within the district, sufficient, together with any
money from the sources described in section 50-3107(3), Idaho Code, to pay
debt service on the bonds when due. The levy shall be made by resolution
entered upon the minutes of the district board, and it shall be the duty of
the clerk of the district, immediately after entry of the resolution in the
minutes, to transmit to the board of county commissioners in each county
in which the district is located the certification required under section
50-3114, Idaho Code. Such tax levied shall then be collected and accounted
for at the time and in the form and manner as other taxes are collected and
accounted for under the laws of this state. Moneys derived from the levy of
property taxes to pay the debt service on the bonds shall be kept separately
from other funds of the district. A district's levy of property taxes shall
constitute a lien on all taxable real property within the district.
(9) The district may issue and sell refunding bonds to refund general
obligation bonds of the district authorized by this section. The principal
amount of the refunding bonds may be more or less than the principal amount of
the bonds being refunded, provided that the proceeds of the refunding bonds
are used only for refunding purposes and payment of the costs thereof, and
the total obligation of the district is not increased, that is, if the amount
of the refunding bonds is more than the principal amount of the bonds being
refunded, issuance of the refunding bonds will result in a net present value
savings to the district. No election shall be required in connection with
the issuance and sale of such refunding bonds. Refunding bonds issued pur-
suant to this section shall have a final maturity date no later than the final
maturity date of the bonds being refunded.
SECTION 4. That Section 50-3111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-3111. TERMS OF BONDS. (1) For any bonds issued under this chap-
ter, the district board shall prescribe the denominations of the bonds, the
principal amount of each issue and the form of the bonds and shall establish
the maturities, which shall not exceed thirty (30) years from the date of
issuance of such bonds, interest payment dates and interest rates, whether
fixed or variable, not exceeding the maximum rate stated in the notice of
the election or the resolution of the district board. The bonds, up to the
aggregate authorized principal amount thereof, may be issued in whole or
divided into series, and by supplementary resolution adopted from time to
time by the district board, the district may issue any remaining principal


amount of the bonds in one (1) or more subsequent divisions. No election
shall be required in connection with the issuance of any remaining principal
amount of the bonds in a subsequent division. The bonds may be sold by com-
petitive bid or negotiated sale for public or private offering at, below or
above par. The proceeds of the bonds shall be deposited with the treasurer,
or with a trustee or agent designated by the district board, to the credit
of the district to be withdrawn for the purposes provided by this chapter.
Pending that use, the proceeds may be invested as determined by the district
board. The bonds shall be made payable as to both principal and interest
solely from revenues of the district, and shall specify the revenues pledged
for such purposes, and shall contain such other terms, conditions, covenants
and agreements as the district board deems proper. The bonds may be payable
from any combination of taxes or revenues of the types described in sections
50-3108, 50-3109 and , 50-3110, and 50-3122, Idaho Code.
(2) Any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter on and after July 1, 2026,
shall be automatically discharged, regardless of any principal or interest
that may be outstanding, on the date that is forty (40) years after the is-
suance of such series of bonds. Such discharge date shall be automatic and
shall not require any further action on the part of the district.
(3) Any district formed pursuant to this chapter shall be dissolved in
the year that is five (5) years after completion of all work to be performed
under a district's general plan, as long as no bonds remain outstanding. If
any bonds remain outstanding after such year, such district shall be dis-
solved in the year after such bonds are paid.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 31, Title 50, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 50-3122, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
50-3122. FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES FEES
FOR DISTRICTS FORMED AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026. (1) A community infrastructure
district formed after January 1, 2026, may impose an annual fee for fire pro-
tection services and emergency medical services if authorized by the govern-
ing body in the district development agreement.
(2) A fee under this section may be imposed on each residential property
for a term not to exceed five (5) years, commencing upon the transfer of title
to the first residential homeowner. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the district shall be exempt from providing public notice when
a fee is imposed on a property for the first time. The existence, terms, and
any applicable amounts of the fee shall be disclosed in the property disclo-
sure notice and shall be signed and acknowledged by any purchaser prior to
purchase. The obligation to pay the fee shall run with the property, and any
subsequent owner who acquires title within the original five (5) year period
shall be responsible for payment of the fee for the remainder of that five (5)
year term. No fee under this section may be extended or renewed beyond its
initial five (5) year term, and each such fee shall expire at the end of the
five (5) year term without further notice or action. Upon the expiration of
the fee for a property as provided in this section, the district shall have no
further authority to impose a fee under this section on that same property.
(3) The initial amount of the fee and any provision for annual increases
shall be as set forth in the district development agreement, provided that


the amount of the fee shall not increase by more than two percent (2%) in any
year.
(4) The fee shall be collected and accounted for at the time and in the
form and manner as property taxes are collected and accounted for under the
laws of this state. All revenues from the fee shall be kept separate from
other district funds in a dedicated fund and may accumulate from year to year
to ensure the availability of moneys to pay for or offset the costs of fire
protection services and emergency medical services as authorized in this
section.
(5) The district board shall budget and disburse the fee proceeds col-
lected pursuant to this section solely to pay for or offset the costs of
fire protection services and emergency medical services for the district.
Permissible expenditures shall include but not be limited to salaries and
benefits of fire protection services personnel and emergency medical ser-
vices personnel; procurement, maintenance, repair, or replacement of fire
protection services or emergency medical services equipment; fire protec-
tion services training; emergency medical services training; and other
operational expenses necessary for fire protection and emergency response.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the fee may be pledged to
bonds issued by the district if a portion of the net proceeds of bonds is used
to fund the costs of fire protection services and emergency medical services
for the district.
(6) The district may enter into agreements with cities, fire protection
districts, ambulance districts, or other service providers to furnish fire
protection services or emergency medical services to the district and may
distribute fee revenues to such service providers pursuant to such agree-
ments or as provided in the district development agreement. In no event
shall the district be required to pay any amount in excess of collections
from the fees.
SECTION 6. That Section 50-3112, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-3112. NOTICE AND CONDUCT OF ELECTION. (1) Any election pursuant
to this chapter shall be a nonpartisan election, and in regard to election
dates, shall be held in compliance with section 34-106, Idaho Code, or sec-
tion 50-405, Idaho Code. Except as otherwise specifically set forth in this
section, the district board shall cause the election to be held and conducted
in the same manner prescribed by law for the holding of general elections in
this state, including chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and shall call the
election by posting notices in three (3) public places within the boundaries
of the district not less than thirty (30) days before the election. Notice
shall also be published twice, the first time not less than twelve (12) days
prior to the election and the second time not less than five (5) days prior to
the election, in a newspaper of general circulation in each county or city
in which the proposed district is located. A copy of such notice shall also
be mailed to each district resident and each owner of real property in the
district if known or such owner's agent if known, addressed to such person
at his or her post office address if known or, if unknown, to a post office in
the county or city where the district is located. Ownership of real property


shall be determined as of the date of the adoption of the resolution ordering
the hearing. The notice shall state:
(a) The place of holding the election;
(b) Subject to section 34-1409, Idaho Code, the hours during the day in
which the polls will be open;
(c) If the election is a bond election, whether the bonds are general
obligation bonds or revenue bonds, the total principal amount of bonds
to be authorized, whether the bonds will be issued in series, the maxi-
mum rate of interest to be paid on the bonds and the maximum term of the
bonds, not exceeding thirty (30) years;
(d) If the election is an election to change or eliminate an existing
tax, the maximum tax amount to be imposed as a result of the change or
elimination;
(e) The purposes for which property taxes levied and revenues raised
will be used, including a description of the community infrastructure
to be financed with tax revenues, district revenues or bond proceeds;
(f) That the imposition of property taxes will result in a lien for the
payment thereof on real property within the district; and
(g) That a general plan is on file with the county clerk of each county
in which the district is located.
(2) The district board shall determine the date of the election and the
polling place or places for the election. The district board may establish,
change, and consolidate election precincts within the district, as it deems
necessary and appropriate, and shall define precinct boundaries.
(3) Subject to section 50-3102(10) and (13) 50-3102(11) and (14), Idaho
Code, the current property rolls for the district and current voter lists in
effect at the time that the election has begun shall be used to determine the
qualified electors. If the district includes land lying partly in and partly
out of any precinct, the voter lists may contain the names of all electors in
the precinct, and the precinct boards at those precincts shall require that a
prospective elector execute an affidavit stating that the elector is also a
qualified elector.
(4) If the district is to be located within two (2) or more counties
and/or cities, the election shall be held on the same day in each jurisdic-
tion.
(5) The ballot material provided to each voter shall include:
(a) For an election concerning the issuance of bonds, an impartial de-
scription of the bonds to be issued and an impartial description of the
property taxes to be imposed; the method of apportionment, collection
and enforcement and other details sufficient to enable each qualified
elector to reasonably estimate the amount of tax he or she will be obli-
gated to pay; and a statement that the issuance of the bonds and the im-
position of property taxes is for the provision of certain, but not nec-
essarily all, community infrastructure that may be needed or desirable
within the district, and that other taxes or assessments by other gov-
ernmental entities may be presented for approval by qualified electors;
and
(b) For an election to change an existing maximum tax or eliminate an
existing tax, an impartial description of the change or elimination.


(6) Within ten (10) days after an election, the district board shall
meet and canvass the returns, and declare the results thereof. At least a
two-thirds (2/3) majority of the votes cast at the election shall be required
for issuing bonds or changing an existing tax. The canvass may be continued
for an additional period not to exceed thirty (30) days at the election of the
district board for the purpose of completing the canvass. Failure of a re-
quired majority to vote in favor of the matter submitted shall not prejudice
the submission of the same or similar matters at a later election. The can-
vass of any general obligation bond election shall be filed and recorded in
each county in which the district is located.
(7) In any election held pursuant to this chapter, every voter may vote
at any election held pursuant to this chapter, but shall be entitled to cast
votes, as follows: (i) each resident qualified elector shall be entitled to
one (1) vote; and (ii) each owner qualified elector shall be entitled to one
(1) vote. An owner qualified elector shall not be entitled to an additional
vote as a result of also being a resident of the district. When record title
is held in more than one (1) name, the owners shall file with the clerk of the
district at or prior to the election a designation in writing, of which one of
the owners shall be deemed the owner for purposes of voting.
(8) In conducting an election, the polling official may require evi-
dence of ownership of property and designation of the power to exercise the
vote of any owner consistent with the provisions of this section and section
50-3102(10) 50-3102(11), Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.